Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321E.29B, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. Notwithstanding section 321E.8 , the department permit-issuing authority may issue annual permits for the operation of vehicles or combinations of vehicles transporting fluid milk products to or from a milk plant, receiving station, or transfer station, exceeding the weight limitation of section 321.463 but not exceeding a gross weight of ninety-six one hundred thirty-six thousand pounds , on primary roads and primary road extensions in cities . The department shall establish rules regarding minimum distances for axle configurations. Senate File 2429, p. 2 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2429, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor